Rhode Island statutes. Title 18 Fiduciaries
Chapter 10 Registration of Securities in Name
of Nominee

18-10-1.
Authority to register security in name of nominee.

Any trust company or national banking association doing business in this state when acting as executor, administrator, guardian, conservator, testamentary trustee, or trustee under any other instrument, whether alone or jointly with an individual or individuals, may, with the consent of the individual fiduciary or fiduciaries, if any, who are authorized to give consent, cause any stock, shares, bonds, debentures, notes, mortgages, or other securities in any corporation, business trust, or association, or any other personal property held in any capacity, to be registered and held in the name of a nominee or nominees of the trust company or national banking association, which nominee or nominees may be an individual or individuals, a partnership, or a corporation, without mention of the trust or fiduciary relationship in the certificate or other instrument or document representing the property or evidencing the title to the property.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 101, § 1.

18-10-2.
Direction for registration by individual fiduciary.

Any individual or individuals acting as executor, administrator, guardian, conservator, testamentary trustee, or trustee under any other instrument is and are authorized, respectively, to direct any trust company or national banking association doing business in this state to cause any property deposited with the trust company or national banking association by the individual or individuals as fiduciary or fiduciaries to be registered and held in the name of a nominee or nominees of the trust company or national banking association, which nominee or nominees may be an individual or individuals, a partnership, or a corporation, without mention of the trust or fiduciary relationship in the certificate or other instrument or document representing the property or evidencing the title to the property.

The trust company or national banking association shall not redeliver the property to the individual fiduciary or fiduciaries, causing any property to be registered in the name of a nominee or nominees of the trust company or national banking association, without first causing the property to be registered in the name of the individual fiduciary or fiduciaries as redelivered property.

Any sale of the property made by the trust company or national banking association at the direction of the individual fiduciary or fiduciaries shall not be construed to be a redelivery.

The trust company or national banking association may make any disposition of the property authorized or directed in any order or decree of any court having jurisdiction of the property.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 101, § 2.

18-10-3.
Liability of trust company or banking association — Accounts to show ownership.

Any trust company or national banking association shall be absolutely liable for any loss occasioned by the acts of any nominee or nominees of the trust company or national banking association with respect to any property so registered.

The records of the fiduciary, whether corporate or individual, and the records of the trust company or national banking association in case of the registry of any property under the provisions of §

18-10-2

, and all reports or accounts rendered by any fiduciary, corporate or individual, shall clearly show the ownership of the property by the fiduciary, corporate or individual.

Any property so registered shall at all times be kept separate and apart from the assets of the trust company or national banking association.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 101, § 3.

18-10-4.
Corporation or transfer agent relieved of liability on transfer of stock.

In case any stock, shares, bonds, debentures, notes, or other securities are registered in the name of a nominee or nominees in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, the corporation, joint stock company, business trust, or association which has issued any securities, and the transfer agent or agents and the registrar or registrars thereof, shall be fully relieved from liability for any loss occasioned by the acts of any fiduciary or of any depositary under §

18-10-2

, or of the nominee or nominees with respect to securities registered in the name of the nominee or nominees.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 101, § 4.

18-10-5.
Applicability.

This chapter applies to all trusts, estates, and other fiduciary relationships, whether currently existing or subsequently created.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 101, § 5.